North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 4. Organization and System for Delivery of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.
“(1) The number of North Carolinians who are serving or who have served in the active or reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States.

“(2) Military culture.

“(3) The average number of deployments, length of time in conflict zones, and potential injuries these members may have faced, particularly those who have served recently in Iraq or Afghanistan.

“(4) The potential impact of the deployment cycle on family members and children. This information shall include information about resiliency skills, intervention skills, resources, and community supports, with a focus on the critical role of the faith community in the provision of assistance with needed service, personal support, and, when necessary, grief counseling.

“(5) Early identification of individual or family members with mental health or substance abuse disorders and appropriate referral sources.

“(d) On or before July 1, 2012, the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services shall report on the curriculum developed pursuant to this section to the Joint Legislative Health Care Oversight Committee, the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Subcommittees on Health and Human Services, and the House of Representatives Committee on Homeland Security, Military, and Veterans Affairs.”

Session Laws
2012-171, ss. 1-3 provide: “1. Qualified provider. — The Department of Health and Human Services (Department) shall ensure that Critical Access Behavioral Health Agencies (CABHAs) are the only providers of the following Medicaid services: (i) Community Support Team; (ii) Intensive In-Home; and (iii) Child and Adolescent Day Treatment. CABHAs shall provide these services in accordance with all of the following:

“(1) State statutory requirements regulating the provision of mental health and substance abuse services in Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.

“(2) Chapters 21 through 25 and Chapter 27 of Title 10A of the North Carolina Administrative Code.

“(3) Clinical policy requirements specified in Medicaid Clinical Coverage Policy, Section 8, and in the 1915(b) MH/DD/SAS Health Plan Waiver.

“(4) Federal Medicaid policy as outlined in 42 C.F.R. Chapter IV, Subchapter C.

“2. Required services. — Each CABHA shall, at a minimum, provide comprehensive clinical assessment, medication management, outpatient therapy, and at least two of the following listed services within an age and disability-specific continuum:

“(1) Intensive In-Home.

“(2) Community Support Team.

“(3) Child and Adolescent Day Treatment.

“(4) Substance Abuse Intensive Outpatient Program.

“(5) Substance Abuse Comprehensive Outpatient Treatment.

“(6) Child and Adolescent Residential Treatment Level II — Family and Program Type, Level III, or Level IV (provision of multiple residential service levels counts as one service).

“(7) Psychosocial Rehabilitation.

“(8) Assertive Community Treatment Team.

“(9) Multi-Systemic Therapy.

“(10) Partial Hospitalization.

“(11) Substance Abuse Medically Monitored Community Residential Treatment.

“(12) Substance Abuse Non-Medical Community Residential Treatment.

“(13) Outpatient Opioid Treatment.

“(14) Any other mental health or substance abuse service required to be delivered by a CABHA as set forth in the North Carolina State Plan of Medical Assistance as approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) or in a waiver approved by CMS pursuant to
42 U.S.C. § 1915(b).

“3. Staffing. — In accordance with the North Carolina State Plan of Medical Assistance, the Department shall ensure each CABHA meet the following staffing requirements:

“(1) A medical director who is a medical doctor licensed in North Carolina, enrolled as a provider, and in good standing with the Division of Medical Assistance. The medical director shall provide medical, clinical, and quality management oversight of the agency’s CABHA services described in Section 2 of this act.

“(2) A clinical director who shall be one of the following licensed or certified providers:

“a. Licensed medical doctor.

“b. Licensed psychologist.

“c. Licensed clinical social worker.

“d. Licensed psychological associate.

“e. Licensed professional counselor.

“f. Licensed marriage and family therapist.

“g. Licensed nurse practitioner.

“h. Licensed clinical addiction specialist.

“i. Certified clinical supervisor.

“(3) A quality management/training director who shall have any training or experience in quality management or training.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2013.’ ”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 38.2, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 38.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2017.’ ”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 39.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2018-33, s. 46, made subdivision (b)(7a) of this section, as added by Session Laws
2018-33, s. 6, effective October 1, 2019, and applicable to proceedings initiated on or after that date.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-323, ss. 10.49(
l
) and 10.49(hh), effective July 1, 2007, rewrote subdivision (b)(5); and substituted “may neither remove from an LME nor designate another entity as eligible to implement” for “may not remove from an LME” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (d).

Session Laws 2007-484, s. 18, effective August 30, 2007, substituted “G.S. 122C-124.1” for “G.S. 122C-142.1” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (d).

Session Laws 2007-484, s. 43.7(b), effective July 1, 2007, substituted “Conducting customer” for “Customer” in subdivision (b)(5)f.

Session Laws 2007-504, s. 1.2, as amended by Session Laws 2007-484, s. 43.7(c), effective July 1, 2007, inserted “are designated in this subsection and shall not be conducted by any other entity unless an LME voluntarily enters into a contract with that entity under subsection (c) of this section. The primary functions” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (b); inserted “and administrative functions” in subdivision (b)(1); inserted “fails to adequately document the provision of services, fails to provide required staff training” in subdivision (b)(2); rewrote subdivisions (b)(3) and (b)(5); added the concluding paragraph of subsection (b); rewrote subsection (c); in subsection (d), substituted “G.S. 122C-124.1” for “G.S. 122C-142.1,” substituted “neither” for “not,” and inserted “nor designate another entity as eligible to implement.”

Session Laws 2008-107, s. 10.15(cc), effective July 1, 2008, inserted “consecutive” in subdivision (d)(1); and substituted “three” for “six” in subdivisions (d)(3) and (d)(4).

Session Laws 2009-186, s. 1, effective July 1, 2009, added subdivision (b)(8).

Session Laws 2009-189, s. 1, effective June 26, 2009, rewrote subdivision (b)(2).

Session Laws 2011-185, s. 6, effective June 20, 2011, added subsection (g).

Session Laws 2011-291, s. 2.45, effective June 24, 2011, substituted “Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services” for “Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services” in subsection (e).

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(nnnnn), effective December 1, 2017, substituted “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” for “Division of Adult Correction” in subdivision (g)(1).

Session Laws 2018-33, s. 6, added subdivision (b)(7a). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z), substituted “Division of Juvenile Justice” for “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” in subdivision (g)(1). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.